lexc/se.lexc
!***** se.lexc *****
! Th. Fransen, 13/08/19

!\\\\\ DECLARE MULTICHAR SYMBOLS /////

Multichar_Symbols

! *UPPER symbols (Tags)*

+
+1P
+2P
+3P
+ABS
+AUG
+COND
+CONJ
+CONSUETUD
+EMPH
+FEM
+FUT
+IMPERS
+IPF
+IMP
+IND
+MASC
+NEUT
+PASS
+PAST
+PL
+PRON
+PRS
+PRT
+PV1
+PV2
+PV3
+PV4
+REL
+RUL
+SG
+SUBJ
+SUBST
+VROOT
+W1
+W2a

! *LOWER symbols*

^D
^F
^M
^N
^S
^U
^V
^Vemph1SG
^Vemph2SG
^Vemph3P
^UNKNOWN

! *Flags*

@P.W2a.ON@
@R.W2a.ON@
@D.PV@
@D.PART.NO@
@R.PV.AD@
@R.PV.ARE@
@R.PV.COM@
@R.PV.FO@
@R.PV.IMBI@
@R.PV.TO@
@R.PV.SV@

!\\\\\ BEGIN CONTINUATION CLASSES /////

!\\\\\ STEMS /////

!*** Root = start ***

LEXICON Root
@D.PV@			simpleStems;
@D.PART.NO@		compoundStems;
				substV;
	
!*** simple vs. compound ***

LEXICON simpleStems
	simpleW1;
	simpleW2a;
! continuation classes for strong types can be added later

LEXICON compoundStems
	compoundW1;
	compoundW2a;
! continuation classes for strong types can be added later

!*** Shell script inserts stems, maintained in separate files, for <PLACEHOLDERS> ***

LEXICON simpleW1
+an+VROOT:an						W1;

+car+VROOT:car						W1;

+celebrare+VROOT:celebr				W1;

+fer+VROOT:fer						W1;

+marb+VROOT:marb					W1;

+gat+VROOT:gat						W1;	

+íad+VROOT:íad						W1;

+las+VROOT:las						W1;

+marb+VROOT:marb					W1;

+múch+VROOT:múch					W1;

+rann+VROOT:rann					W1;

+scar+VROOT:scar					W1;

LEXICON simpleW2a
+aisic+VROOT:aisic					W2a;

+bris+VROOT:bris					W2a;

+glúais+VROOT:glúais				W2a;

+lēc+VROOT:léic						W2a;
+ro+AUG+lēc+VROOT:reiləc			W2a;

+rād+VROOT:rád						W2a;
+ro+AUG+rād+VROOT:rorəd				W2a;

LEXICON compoundW1
@R.PV.AD@+ell+VROOT:ell												W1;
@D.PV@+ad+PV1+ell+VROOT:adell										W1;

@R.PV.TO@+ell+VROOT:all												W1;
@D.PV@+to+PV1+ell+VROOT:tall										W1;

@R.PV.TO@+imbi+PV2+cell+VROOT:i^Məchell								W1;
@D.PV@+to+PV1+imbi+PV2+cell+VROOT:ti^Məchell						W1;

@R.PV.FO@+fer+VROOT:fer												W1;

@R.PV.IMBI@+múch+VROOT:múch											W1;

LEXICON compoundW2a
@R.PV.ARE@+āl+VROOT:ál												W2a;

@R.PV.ARE@+sēt+VROOT:pett											W2a;

@R.PV.TO@+lēc+VROOT:léic											W2a;
@R.PV.TO@+ro+AUG+lēc+VROOT:reiləc									W2a;
@D.PV@+to+PV1+lēc+VROOT:teiləc  									W2a;
@D.PV@+to+PV1+ro+AUG+lēc+VROOT:tarələc								W2a;

@R.PV.FO@+dāl+VROOT:dáil											W2a;
@D.PV@+fo+PV1+dāl+VROOT:fodəl										W2a;

@R.PV.FO@+ruim+VROOT:ruim											W2a;

@R.PV.IMBI@+rād+VROOT:rád											W2a;
@R.PV.IMBI@+ro+AUG+rād+VROOT:rorəd									W2a;

!*** Weak stem formation ***

LEXICON W1
+W1:ā	weakStemFormation;

LEXICON W2a
@P.W2a.ON@+W2a:ī	weakStemFormation;

LEXICON weakStemFormation
+PRS+IND:0		weakPresIndEndings;
+IMP:0			weakImpEndings;
+IPF:0			secEndings;
+PRS+SUBJ:0		aEndings;
+PAST+SUBJ:0	secEndings;
+FUT:^F			aEndings; 
+COND:^F		secEndings;
+PRT:^S			sPretEndings; 
+PRT+PASS:θ		pretPassEndings;

!\\\\\ ENDINGS /////

LEXICON weakPresIndEndings
+ABS+1P+SG:^M'				Emph1sg; 
@R.W2a.ON@+ABS+1P+SG:u		Emph1sg;
+ABS+2P+SG:i				Emph2sg;
+ABS+3P+SG:θ'				suffAbs3sg;
+ABS+3P+SG+REL:s			Emph3sg;
+ABS+1P+PL:^M'i				Emph1pl;
+ABS+1P+PL+REL:^M'e			Emph1pl;
+ABS+2P+PL:θ'e				Emph2pl;
+ABS+3P+PL:t'				Emph3pl;
+ABS+3P+PL+REL:^V^D'e		Emph3pl;
+CONJ+1P+SG:^M'				Emph;
@R.W2a.ON@+CONJ+1P+SG:u		Emph;
+CONJ+2P+SG:i				Emph;
+CONJ+3P+SG:0				Emph;
+CONJ+1P+PL:μ				Emph;
+CONJ+2P+PL:θ'				Emph;
+CONJ+3P+PL:t				Emph;
+PASS:0						pass1Endings;

LEXICON weakImpEndings
+CONJ+1P+SG:^M'				Emph;
@R.W2a.ON@+CONJ+1P+SG:u		Emph;
+CONJ+2P+SG:Ø				Emph;
+CONJ+3P+SG:θ				Emph;
+CONJ+1P+PL:μ				Emph;
+CONJ+2P+PL:θ'				Emph;
+CONJ+3P+PL:t				Emph;
+PASS:0						pass1Endings;

LEXICON aEndings
+ABS+1P+SG:a			Emph1sg;
+ABS+2P+SG:e			Emph2sg;
+ABS+3P+SG:θ'			suffAbs3sg;
+ABS+3P+SG+REL:s		Emph3sg;
+ABS+1P+PL:^M'i			Emph1pl;
+ABS+1P+PL+REL:^M'e		Emph1pl;
+ABS+2P+PL:θ'e			Emph2pl;
+ABS+3P+PL:t'			Emph3pl;
+ABS+3P+PL+REL:^V^D'e	Emph3pl;
+CONJ+1P+SG:Ø			Emph;
+CONJ+2P+SG:e			Emph;
+CONJ+3P+SG:a			Emph;
+CONJ+1P+PL:μ			Emph;
+CONJ+2P+PL:θ'			Emph;
+CONJ+3P+PL:t			Emph;
+PASS:0					pass1Endings;

LEXICON sPretEndings
+ABS+1P+SG:u			Emph1sg;
+ABS+2P+SG:'i			Emph2sg;
+ABS+3P+SG:'			suffAbs3sg;
+ABS+3P+SG+REL:0		Emph3sg;
+ABS+1P+PL:ə^M'i		Emph1pl;
+ABS+1P+PL+REL:ə^M'e	Emph1pl;
+ABS+2P+PL:^UNKNOWN		Emph2pl;
+ABS+3P+PL:ət'			Emph3pl;
+ABS+3P+PL+REL:ət'e		Emph3pl;
+CONJ+1P+SG:^U			Emph;
+CONJ+2P+SG:'			Emph;
+CONJ+3P+SG:Ø			Emph;
+CONJ+1P+PL:əμ			Emph;
+CONJ+2P+PL:əθ'			Emph;
+CONJ+3P+PL:ət			Emph;

LEXICON pass1Endings	
+ABS+3P+SG:θ'ər'		Emph3sg;
+ABS+3P+SG+REL:θ'ər		Emph3sg;
+ABS+3P+PL:t'ər'  		Emph3pl;
+ABS+3P+PL+REL:^V^Dər	Emph3pl;
+CONJ+3P+SG:θ'ər   		Emph; 
+CONJ+3P+PL:^V^Dər		Emph3pl;

LEXICON pretPassEndings	
+ABS+3P+SG:e		Emph3sg;
+ABS+3P+SG+REL:e	Emph3sg;
+ABS+3P+PL:i  		Emph3pl;
+ABS+3P+PL+REL:i	Emph3pl;
+CONJ+3P+SG:0    	Emph; 
+CONJ+3P+PL:a    	Emph3pl;

LEXICON secEndings
+CONJ+1P+SG:^N'			Emph;
+CONJ+2P+SG:θa			Emph;
+CONJ+3P+SG:θ			Emph;  
+PASS+CONJ+3P+SG:θ'e	Emph;
+CONJ+1P+PL:^M'əs'		Emph; 
+CONJ+2P+PL:θ'e			Emph;
+CONJ+3P+PL:t'əs'		Emph;
+PASS+CONJ+3P+PL:t'əs'	Emph;

!\\\\\ SUBSTANTIVE VERB /////

LEXICON substV
@R.PV.SV@+tá+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND:0		Tá;
@D.PV@+tá+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND:0			Tá;
@D.PV@+fil+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND:0		Fil;
@D.PV@									Bí;
@D.PV@									TápresWithSuffPron;
@D.PV@									BípretWithSuffPron;

LEXICON Tá
+CONJ+1P+SG:táu						Emph1sg;
+CONJ+1P+SG:tó						Emph2sg;
+CONJ+3P+SG:tá						Emph3sg;
@D.PV@+IMPERS+CONJ+3P+SG:táthar		#;
+CONJ+1P+PL:taam					Emph1pl;
+CONJ+2P+PL:taid					Emph2pl;
+CONJ+3P+PL:taat					Emph3pl;

LEXICON Fil
+ABS+3P+SG:fil			#;
+ABS+3P+SG+REL:fil		#;
+ABS+3P+SG+REL:file		#;
+CONJ+3P+SG:fil			#;

LEXICON Bí
	SVconsuetud;
	SVimpf;
	SVpret;
	SVfut;
	SVcond;
	SVimp;
	SVpresSubj;
	SVpastSubj;
	
LEXICON SVconsuetud
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+ABS+1P+SG:biuu			Emph1sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+ABS+3P+SG:biid			Emph3sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+ABS+3P+SG+REL:biis		Emph3sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+ABS+3P+SG+REL:bís			Emph3sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+IMPERS+ABS+3P+SG:bíthir	#;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+ABS+1P+PL:bímmi			Emph1pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+ABS+1P+PL+REL:bímme		Emph1pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+ABS+3P+PL:biit			Emph3pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+ABS+3P+PL+REL:bíte		Emph3pl;

+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+CONJ+1P+SG:bíu					Emph1sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+CONJ+2P+SG:bí						Emph2sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+CONJ+3P+SG:bí						Emph;
+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+CONJ+3P+SG:rubai			Emph;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+IMPERS+CONJ+3P+SG:bíther			#;	
+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+IMPERS+CONJ+3P+SG:rubthar	#;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+CONJ+1P+PL:biam					Emph1pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+CONJ+3P+PL:biat					Emph3pl;
+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+CONSUETUD+CONJ+3P+PL:rubat			Emph3pl;

LEXICON SVimpf
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+IPF+CONJ+1P+SG:biinn			Emph1sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+IPF+CONJ+3P+SG:bíth				Emph;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+IPF+IMPERS+CONJ+3P+SG:bíthe		#;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+IPF+CONJ+1P+PL:bimmis			Emph1pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+IPF+CONJ+3P+PL:bítis			Emph3pl;

LEXICON SVpret
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+ABS+1P+SG:bá				Emph1sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+ABS+2P+SG:bá				Emph2sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+ABS+3P+SG:boí				Emph3sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+ABS+3P+SG+REL:boíe			Emph3sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+IMPERS+ABS+3P+SG:bothae		#;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+ABS+1P+PL:bámmar			Emph1pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+ABS+3P+PL:bátar				Emph3pl;

+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+CONJ+1P+SG:bá				Emph1sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+CONJ+2P+SG:bá				Emph2sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+CONJ+3P+SG:boí				Emph;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+IMPERS+CONJ+3P+SG:both		#;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+CONJ+1P+PL:bámmar			Emph1pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+CONJ+2P+PL:báid				Emph2pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+CONJ+3P+PL:bátar			Emph3pl;

+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+CONJ+1P+SG:roba				Emph1sg;
+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+CONJ+1P+SG:raba				Emph1sg;
+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+CONJ+2P+SG:raba				Emph2sg;
+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+CONJ+3P+SG:robae				Emph;
+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+CONJ+3P+SG:rabae				Emph;
+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+IMPERS+CONJ+3P+SG:robad		#;
+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+CONJ+1P+PL:roba^Vmmar		Emph1pl;
+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+CONJ+2P+PL:robaid			Emph2pl;
+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+CONJ+3P+PL:robatar			Emph3pl;
+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRT+CONJ+3P+PL:rabatar			Emph3pl; 

LEXICON SVfut
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+FUT+ABS+1P+SG:bia				Emph1sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+FUT+ABS+2P+SG:bie				Emph2sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+FUT+ABS+3P+SG:bieid				Emph3sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+FUT+ABS+3P+SG:bied				Emph3sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+FUT+ABS+3P+SG+REL:bias			Emph3sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+FUT+IMPERS+ABS+3P+SG:bethir		#;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+FUT+ABS+1P+PL:bemmi				Emph1pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+FUT+ABS+2P+PL:bethe				Emph2pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+FUT+ABS+3P+PL:bieit				Emph3pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+FUT+ABS+3P+PL+REL:bete			Emph3pl;

+bí+VROOT+SUBST+FUT+CONJ+3P+SG:bia		Emph;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+FUT+CONJ+1P+PL:biam		Emph1pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+FUT+CONJ+2P+PL:bieid	Emph2pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+FUT+CONJ+2P+PL:bied		Emph2pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+FUT+CONJ+3P+PL:biat		Emph3pl;

LEXICON SVcond
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+COND+CONJ+1P+SG:beinn	Emph1sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+COND+CONJ+3P+SG:biad	Emph;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+COND+CONJ+1P+PL:bemmis	Emph1pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+COND+CONJ+3P+PL:betis	Emph3pl;

LEXICON SVimp
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+IMP+CONJ+2P+SG:bí		Emph1sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+IMP+CONJ+3P+SG:biid		Emph2sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+IMP+CONJ+3P+SG:bíth		Emph;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+IMP+CONJ+2P+PL:biid		Emph2pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+IMP+CONJ+2P+PL:bíth		Emph2pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+IMP+CONJ+3P+PL:biat		Emph3pl;

LEXICON SVpresSubj
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+ABS+1P+SG:béo				Emph1sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+ABS+1P+SG:béu				Emph1sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+ABS+2P+SG:bé				Emph2sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+ABS+2P+SG:bee				Emph2sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+ABS+3P+SG:beiθ				Emph3sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+ABS+3P+SG+REL:bes			Emph3sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+IMPERS+ABS+3P+SG:bethir	#;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+ABS+1P+PL:bemmi			Emph1pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+ABS+2P+PL:bethe			Emph2pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+ABS+3P+PL:beit				Emph3pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+ABS+3P+PL+REL:bete			Emph3pl;

+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+CONJ+1P+SG:béo		Emph1sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+CONJ+2P+SG:bé		Emph2sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+CONJ+3P+SG:bé		Emph;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+CONJ+1P+PL:bem		Emph1pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+CONJ+2P+PL:beid	Emph2pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+CONJ+3P+PL:bet		Emph3pl;

+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+CONJ+3P+SG:roib		Emph; 
+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+CONJ+1P+PL:robam	Emph1pl;
+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+CONJ+2P+PL:robith	Emph2pl;
+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+SUBJ+CONJ+3P+PL:robat	Emph3pl;

LEXICON SVpastSubj
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PAST+SUBJ+CONJ+1P+SG:beinn			Emph1sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PAST+SUBJ+CONJ+2P+SG:betha			Emph2sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PAST+SUBJ+CONJ+3P+SG:beθ			Emph3sg;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PAST+SUBJ+IMPERS+CONJ+3P+SG:bethe	#;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PAST+SUBJ+CONJ+1P+PL:bemmis			Emph1pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PAST+SUBJ+CONJ+2P+PL:bethe			Emph2pl;
+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PAST+SUBJ+CONJ+3P+PL:betis			Emph3pl;

+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PAST+SUBJ+CONJ+3P+SG:robad		Emph;
+ro+AUG+bí+VROOT+SUBST+PAST+SUBJ+CONJ+3P+PL:roibtis		Emph3pl;

LEXICON TápresWithSuffPron
+tá+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+1P+SG:táthum			#;
+tá+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+2P+SG:táthut  		#;
+tá+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+3P+SG+MASC:táithi	#;
+tá+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+3P+SG+MASC:táthai  	#;
+tá+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+3P+SG+NEUT:táithi	#;
+tá+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+3P+SG+NEUT:táthai  	#;
+tá+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+3P+SG+FEM:táthus  	#;
+tá+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+1P+PL:táthunn		#;
+tá+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+1P+PL:táithiunn		#;
+tá+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+2P+PL:táthuib		#;
+tá+VROOT+SUBST+PRS+IND+ABS+3P+SG+PRON+3P+PL:táthus			#;
